Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2162.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 17-201, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE17-201. Game and fish department and game and fish commission members; appointment; removal; meetings A. The laws of the state relating to wildlife shall be administered by the game and fish department. Control of the department is vested in the game and fish commission. The commission shall consist of five members, appointed by the governor pursuant to section 38-211. Not more than three members shall be members of the same political party, and no two members may be residents of the same county and not less than one member shall be a cattleman or rancher. Members shall be well informed on the subject of wildlife and requirements for its conservation. Appointments shall be for a term of five years and shall expire on the third Monday in January of the appropriate year. B. The governor may, after a public hearing, remove a member for inefficiency, neglect of duty or misconduct in office. Upon removal of a member the governor shall file in the office of the secretary of state a complete statement of all charges made against the members and his findings thereon, together with a complete record of the proceedings. C. Each member of the commission while attending general or specific meetings of the commission or while performing official duties for the commission shall receive compensation as determined pursuant to section 38-611. A commission member who is otherwise employed as a public officer shall not receive such payment if it is prohibited by law. Compensation and expenses shall be paid monthly from the game and fish fund. D. The commission shall have its principal office at the state capitol but meetings may be held at any time or place within the state. The commission shall meet at least once quarterly. Meetings may be held at the call of the chairman or majority of the commission. A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum to transact business. END_STATUTE